Washington statutes.
RCW 43.380.070

Meetings.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5139-S.SL) ***

(1) Meetings of the council must be held in accordance with the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW, and at the call of the cochairs or when a majority of the council membership so requests. Members may participate in a meeting of the council by means of a conference telephone or similar communication equipment as described in RCW 23B.08.200.

(2) Seven members of the council constitute a quorum.

(3) Once operational, the council must convene on a regular schedule at least four times during each year.

[ 2016 c 188 s 8.]